Utah statutes.
78A-5-105.   Term of judges -- Vacancy.

(1)  Judges of the district courts shall be appointed initially until the first general election held more than three years after the effective date of the appointment.  Thereafter, the term of office for judges of the district courts is six years, and commences on the first Monday in January, next following the date of election.

(2)  A judge whose term expires may serve, upon request of the Judicial Council, until a successor is appointed and qualified.

